Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1251
Temporary visitation.

(a) A court of this state which does not have jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

(1) a visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

(2) the visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

(b) If a court of this state makes an order under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in sections 43-1238 to 43-1247. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 26.